apertium-kan.kan.lexc
LEXICON kondu		!kondu
%+ಕೊಂಡು%<refl%>%<emph%>:ಕೊಂಡೇ # ;
%+ಕೊಂಡು%<refl%>:ಕೊಂಡ # ;
%+ಕೊಂಡು%<refl%>:ಕೊಂಡು # ;
%+ಕೊಂಡು%<refl%>:ಕೊಂಡಿದ್ದಾರೆ # ;
%+ಕೊಂಡು%<refl%>:ಕೊಂಡಿತು # ;
%+ಕೊಂಡು%<refl%>:ಕೊಂಡವು # ;
%+ಕೊಂಡು%<refl%>:ಕೊಂಡಿವೆ # ;!
%+ಕೊಂಡು%<refl%>:ಕೊಳ್ಳುತ್ತವೆ # ;!ಕೊಳ್ಳಬಹುದು
%+ಕೊಂಡು%<refl%>:ಕೊಳ್ಳ bahudu ;!
%+ಕೊಂಡು%<refl%>:ಕೊಳ್ಳಲಾಯಿತು # ;
%+ಕೊಂಡು%<refl%>:ಕೊಂಡಿದ್ದಾನೆ # ;
%+ಕೊಂಡು%<refl%>:ಕೊಂಡರು # ;
%+ಕೊಂಡು%<refl%>:ಕೊಂಡಳು # ;
%+ಕೊಂಡು%<refl%>:ಕೊಳ್ಳ loo ;
%+ಕೊಂಡು%<refl%>:ಕೊಳ್ಳುವ # ;
%+ಕೊಂಡು%<refl%>:ಕೊಳ್ಳುವುದು # ;
%+ಕೊಂಡು%<refl%>:ಕೊಳ್ಳಲಾಗುತ್ತದೆ # ;


LEXICON ಉಂಟ/__vaux
%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>:ಾಗುವ # ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>:ಾಗಿ # ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>:ಾಗ loo ;
%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ಾಗುತ್ತದೆ # ;
%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<pl%>:ಾಗುತ್ತವೆ # ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ಾಯಿತು # ;
%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>:ು # ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>:ಾದ # ;

%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sp%>:ುಮಾಡುವ # ;!
%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ುಮಾಡುತ್ತದೆ # ;!maeduthade

%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<nt%>:ಾಗ bahudu ;
%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<pl%>:ುಮಾಡ ಮಾಡು__v ;


LEXICON __vaux
%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<m%>%<sg%>:ನೆ # ;
%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<f%>%<sg%>:ಳೆ # ;
%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:ರೆ # ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<interr%>:ರೆಯೇ #;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:ಿರುವ # ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ಿದೆ # ;
%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:ುದು # ;

LEXICON r__inda
%+ಇಂದ%<post%>:ರಿಂದ #;
%+ಇಂದ%<post%>:ರಿಂದಲ oo__inc_clit;
%+ಇಂದ%<post%>%<emph%>:ರಿಂದಲೇ #;

LEXICON n__inda
%+ಇಂದ%<post%>:ನಿಂದ #;
%+ಇಂದ%<post%>:ನಿಂದ loo;

LEXICON e__inda
%+ಇಂದ%<post%>:ಿಂದ #;

LEXICON d__inda
%+ಇಂದ%<post%>:ದಿಂದ #;

LEXICON bahudu
%+ಬಹುದು%<pot%>:ಬಹುದು # ;
%+ಬಹುದು%<pot%>:ಬಹುದಾದ # ;
%+ಬಹುದು%<pot%>:ಬಹುದಾಗ ide__vaux ;
%+ಬಹುದು%<pot%>:ಬಹುದ o-clit ;

LEXICON beku  			!presumtive!beku
%+ಬೇಕು%<prsm%>:ಬೇಕು # ;
%+ಬೇಕು%<prsm%>:ಬೇಕೆಂದು # ;!ಬೇಕೆಂಬ
%+ಬೇಕು%<prsm%>:ಬೇಕೆಂಬ # ;!
!%+ಬೇಕು%<prsm%>:ಬೇಕೆಂದ oo__inc_clit ;!ಬೇಕೆಂದೂ
%+ಬೇಕು%<prsm%>%<cni%>:ಬೇಕಾದರೆ # ;
%+ಬೇಕು%<prsm%>:ಬೇಕಾದ # ;!
%+ಬೇಕು%<prsm%>:ಬೇಕಾಗುತ್ತದೆ # ;!
%+ಬೇಕು%<prsm%>:ಬೇಕಾಯಿತು # ;!

LEXICON beku_rep  			!presumtive
%<prsm%>:ಕು # ;
%<prsm%>:ಕೆ parti  ;
!%<prsm%>:ಕೆಂದ oo__inc_clit ;!ಕೆಂದೂ
%<prsm%>%<cni%>:ಕಾದರೆ # ;
%<prsm%>:ಕಾದ # ;!
%<prsm%>:ಕಾದ ashtu ;!
%<prsm%>:ಕಾಗುತ್ತದೆ # ;!
%<prsm%>:ಕಾಯಿತು # ;!


LEXICON ಇರುವ/__vaux
%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ರುವುದು # ;!!ಇದುವುದ
%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:ರುತ್ತಾರೆ # ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:ರುತ್ತಿತ್ತು # ;
%<vaux%>%<ger%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ರುವುದನ್ನು # ;!!ಇದುವುದ
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ದ್ದ # ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ದ್ದುದ r__inda ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<emph%>:ದ್ದೇ # ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:ದ್ದರು # ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:ದ್ದಿತು # ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<pl%>:ದ್ದವು # ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<pl%>:ದ್ದುವು # ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ದ್ದದ್ದು # ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<sp%>%<cni%>:ದ್ದರೆ # ;!
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<cni%>%<emph%>:ದ್ದರೂ # ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<emp%>:ದ್ದು # ;
%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ರುವ # ;!Present-future adjectival
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<cni%>:ರ bahudu ;!ಇರುವಂತಹ
%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ರ beku  ;
%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ರುವ antaha ;
%<vaux%>%:ರುವ aaga ;
%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ರ loo  ;!ಇರಲಿ
%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ರಲಿ #  ;!


%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ತ್ತು # ;
%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<neg%>:ರುವುದಿಲ್ಲ # ;!ಇರುವುದಿಲ್ಲ
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<neg%>:ರಲಿಲ್ಲ # ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ದೆ # ;
%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<pl%>:ರುತ್ತವೆ # ;!ಇರುವುದು
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>:ದ್ದಾ # ;
%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ರುತ್ತದೆ # ;
%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<pl%>:ವೆ # ;
%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:ದ್ದಾರೆ # ;

%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ದುವುದ r__inda ;
%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ರುವುದ r__inda ;
%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ರು ante;
%<vaux%>%:ದ್ ante ;

%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<pl%>:ದ್ದ aaga ;
%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ರುವ aaga ;
%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<neg%>:ಲ್ಲದಿದ್ದರೂ #;!ಲ್ಲದಿದ್ದರೂ


LEXICON ಆಗುವ/__vaux
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ಗಿದ್ದು # ;!ಆಗಿರುತ್ತದೆ
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ಗಿರುತ್ತದೆ # ;!ಆಗಿರುವ
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sp%>:ಗಿರುವ # ;!
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ದ # ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ದಾಗ # ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ಯಿತು # ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sp%>:ಗಿದ್ದರು # ;
%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:ಗಿದ್ದಾರೆ # ;
%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ಗುವ # ;
%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ಗುತ್ತದೆ # ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ಗಿ # ;!aux?ಆ
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<pl%>:ಗಿವೆ # ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ಗಿತ್ತು # ;
%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ಗಿದೆ # ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ಗಿದ್ದ # ;
%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<cni%>:ದರೂ # ;
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:ದರು # ;
%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ಗಲಿ # ;
%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<pl%>:ಗುತ್ತವೆ # ;!ಗುತ್ತವೆ
%<vaux%>%<ger%>%<nom%>:ಗುವುದು # ;

%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<pl%>:ಗಲ illa;!ಆ
%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ಗ loo ;!ಆ
%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sp%>:ಗುವುದ illa ;
%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sp%>:ಗು ante ;


%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sp%>:ಗಿರ bahudu ;!
%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sp%>:ಗ bahudu ;!

LEXICON __prepos
%<pr%>: #;



LEXICON __part
%<part%>: #;

LEXICON ಅಂತ__part
%<part%>: #;
%<part%>: loo;



LEXICON oo__inc_clit!oo
%+also%<clit%>:ೂ #;!inclusive clitic
:ು #;

LEXICON only__adv
%+only%<adv%>:ೇ #;

LEXICON ಎಂದು__part
%<part%>:ು #;
%<part%>%<emph%>:ೇ #;!emph is correct?
%<part%>%<adv%>:oo__inc_clit ;
%<part%>%<adv%>: aagi__com ;



LEXICON endare__part
%+ಎಂದರೆ%<part%>:ೆಂದರೆ  #;



LEXICON aata
%+ಆತ%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಾತ # ;
%+ಆತ%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಾತನ # ;
%+ಆತ%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ಾತನಿಂದ # ;


LEXICON ಎಂಬ__part ! ಎ೦ಬ__part
%<part%>: #;
%<part%>: aata ;
%<part%>:ು ಅದು/__prn;  !%<part%>%:ುದು #;
%<part%>:ುವ ಅವ/__prn ;!%<part%>%<nom%>:ುವರು #;!ಎಂಬ
%<part%>%<nom%>%<pl%>:ುವವರು #;
%<part%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ುದೇ #;
%<part%>%<acc%>:ುದನ್ನ oo__inc_clit;
%<part%>%<gen%>:ುದರ #;
%<part%>%<dat%>:ುದಕ್ಕೆ #;
%<part%>:ುದಾಗಿ __emph;
%<part%>:ುದಾಗಿಯ oo__inc_clit;!ಎಂಬುವರು

LEXICON varege__postpos
%+ವರೆಗೆ%<post%>:ವರೆಗೆ #;
%+ವರೆಗೆ%<post%>:ವರೆಗ oo__inc_clit;

LEXICON  ವರೆಗೆ__postpos
%<post%>:ೆ #;
%<post%>:oo__inc_clit ;
%<post%>:ಿನ #;

LEXICON loo__postpos
%<post%>:# ;
%<post%>:ಲ oo__inc_clit ;

LEXICON __postpos
%<post%>: #;
%<post%>: aagi__com;
%<post%>: ide__vaux;
%<post%>: ವ oo__inc_clit;

LEXICON ve__postpos
%<post%>: #;
%<post%>: aagi__com;
%<post%>: ide__vaux;
%<post%>: ವ oo__inc_clit;
%<post%>:ವೇ #;
%<post%>%<gen%>:ದ #;

LEXICON out__postpos
%<post%>: #;
%<post%>:ಗಿ n__inda;
%<post%>:ಗ oo__inc_clit;
%<post%>:ಗೆ #;
%<post%>%<emph%>:ಗೇ #;
%<post%>:ಗಿನ #;
%<post%>%+ಅವ%<prn%>:ಗಿನವು #;!ಕೆಳ
%<post%>:ಗಿ ide__vaux;
%<post%>%<loc%>:ಯಲ್ಲಿ #;

%<post%>:ಗಡೆ #;
%<post%>:ಕ್ಕೆ #;
%<post%>%<gen%>:ದ #;
%<post%>:ನಿಂದ #;
%<post%>:ಯೇ #;
%<post%>:ದಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<post%>:ಗಿನ ante ;!nante

LEXICON u__postpos
%<post%>%<nom%>:ು #;
%<post%>%<dat%>:ಿಗೆ  #;
%<post%>%<loc%>:ಿನಲ್ಲಿ  #;


LEXICON andu
%<post%>:ದಂದು #;

LEXICON NounRoot
ಬೇಕು:ಬೇ 				beku_rep;
ಕೊಂಡು:ಕೊಂಡ 				__vaux;
ಏನ:ಏನ 					__vaux;
ಎಂದೇ:ಎಂದೇ 				__vaux;!emph?
ಉಂಟು:ಉಂಟ 	 			ಉಂಟ/__vaux;
ಇರುವ:ಇ 					ಇರುವ/__vaux;!iruva
ಹಾಗಿಇರುವ:ಹಾಗಿಇ			ಇರುವ/__vaux;!
ಆಗುವ:ಆ 					ಆಗುವ/__vaux;!ಆಗಿ
ಅದಿರು:ಅದಿರು 				__vaux;	
ಇಸ್:ಇಸ್ 					__vaux;
ಇಸ್:ಈಸ್ 					__vaux;
ಹ್ಯಾವ್ 					__vaux;
ಅಂತ:ಅಂತ 						ಅಂತ__part;
ಅಂತ:ಎಂತ 						ಅಂತ__part;
ಎಂದು:ಎಂದ 						ಎಂದು__part;
ಎಂದು:ಎ౦ದ						ಎಂದು__part;
ಎಂದು:ಯೆಂದ						ಎಂದು__part;
ವೆಂದು:ವೆಂದ 						ಎಂದು__part;
ಅಂದರೆ:ಅಂದರೆ 						__part;
ಅಂದರೆ:ಅವೆಂದರೆ 						__part;
ಅಂದರೆ:ಆಂಡ್ರೆ 						__part;
ಎಂದರೆ:ಎಂದರೆ 						__part;
ಅದೇನೆಂದರೆ:ಅದೇನೆಂದರೆ 				__part;
ಅದೆಂದರೆ:ಅದೆಂದರೆ 					__part;
ಎನ್ನುವ:ಎನ್ನುವ 					__part;
ಏನೋ 							__part;
ಎಂಬ:ಎಂಬ 						ಎಂಬ__part;
ಎ೦ಬ:ಎ೦ಬ 						ಎಂಬ__part;
ಎ೦ಬ:ವೆಂಬ 						ಎಂಬ__part;
ಎಂಬ:ಯೆಂಬ 						ಎಂಬ__part;
ಎಂಬಂತೆ:ಎಂಬಂತೆ 					__part;
ಪೈಕಿಯ:ಪೈಕಿಯ 						__postpos;
ರವರಿಗೆ:ರವರಿಗೆ 						__postpos;
ಬಗೆಗೆ :ಬಗೆಗೆ 		  				__postpos;
ಬಗೆಗಿನ:ಬಗೆಗಿನ 						__postpos;
ಹೊರಗೆ:ಹೊರಗೆ 						__postpos;
ಕುರಿತು:ಕುರಿತು 						__postpos;		
ಕುರಿತ:ಕುರಿತ 						__postpos;
ಕುರಿತಾಗಿ:ಕುರಿತಾಗಿ 					__postpos;
ಕುರಿತಂತೆ:ಕುರಿತಂತೆ  					__postpos;	
ವರೆಗೆ :ವರೆಗ 						ವರೆಗೆ__postpos;
ವರೆಗೆ :ರವರೆಗ 						ವರೆಗೆ__postpos;
ಕಡೆಗೆ:ಕಡೆಗ 							ವರೆಗೆ__postpos;
ಗಿಂತ:ಗಿಂತ 						loo__postpos;
ಕ್ಕಿಂತ:ಕ್ಕಿಂತ 						loo__postpos;
ಮ‌ೂಲಕ:ಮ‌ೂಲಕ 						__postpos;	
ಎಂಬಲ್ಲಿ:ಎಂಬಲ್ಲಿ 					__postpos;
ಸೇರಿದಂತೆ:ಸೇರಿದಂತೆ 					__postpos;
ಸೇರಿ:ಸೇರಿ 						__postpos;
ಜೊತೆಗೆ:ಜೊತೆಗೆ 						__postpos;
ಜೊತೆಗೆ:ಜತೆಗೇ 						__postpos;
ಜೊತೆಗಿನ:ಜೊತೆಗಿನ 					__postpos;
ಜೊತೆಯಲ್ಲಿ:ಜೊತೆಯಲ್ಲಿ 				__postpos;
ಜೊತೆಗೂಡಿ:ಜೊತೆಗೂಡಿ 				__postpos;
ನಂತಹ:ನಂತಹ 		 				__postpos;
ನಂತಹ:ದಂತಹ 						__postpos;
ನಂತಹ:ಯಂತಹ                     	__postpos;
ನಂತಹ:ರಂತಹ                     	__postpos;
ಇಂಥ:ಇಂಥ			  				__postpos;!adj?
ಅಂಥ:ಅಂಥ 		  				__postpos;!adj?
ನಂಥ:ನಂಥ 						__postpos;
ಮುಂದೆ:ಮುಂದೆ 						__postpos;
ಮುಂಚೆ:ಮುಂಚೆ 						__postpos;
ಮುಂಚೆಯೇ:ಮುಂಚೆಯೇ 					__postpos;
ಮೂಲಕ:ಮೂಲಕ						ve__postpos;
ತರ:ತರ 							ve__postpos;
ನಲ್ಲಿ:ನಲ್ಲಿ 						__postpos;
ನಲ್ಲಿನ:ನಲ್ಲಿನ  					__postpos;
ಯಲ್ಲಿ:ಯಲ್ಲಿ 					__postpos;
ಹೊರ:ಹೊರ 						out__postpos;
ಬಳಿ:ಬಳಿ 							out__postpos;
ಮೇಲೆ:ಮೇಲೆ 						out__postpos;
ಮೇಲೆ:ಮೇಲಿ 						out__postpos;
ಆಚೆ:ಆಚೆ                          out__postpos;
ಕೆಳ:ಕೆಳ							out__postpos;
ಒಳ:ಒಳ 							out__postpos;		
ಹೊರಭಾಗ:ಹೊರಭಾಗ                   out__postpos;
ಸುಮಾರು:ಸುಮಾರ						u__postpos;
ಹೊರತು:ಹೊರತು 						__postpos;
ಹೊರತಾದ:ಹೊರತಾದ 					__postpos;
ಹೊರತಾಗಿ:ಹೊರತಾಗಿ 					__postpos;
ಹೊರತಾಗಿಯೂ:ಹೊರತಾಗಿಯೂ 			__postpos;
ಹೊರತುಪಡಿಸಿ:ಹೊರತುಪಡಿಸಿ 			__postpos;
ಹೊರ್ತು:ಹೊರ್ತು 					__postpos;
ಬಗ್ಗೆ:ಬಗ್ಗೆ 						__postpos;
ಬಗ್ಗೆಯೂ:ಬಗ್ಗೆಯೂ 					__postpos;
ಜತೆ:ಜತೆ 							__postpos;
ಜತೆಗೆ:ಜತೆಗೆ 						__postpos;
ಒಂದಿಗೆ:ಒಂದಿಗೆ 						__postpos;
ಒಂದಿಗೆ:ನೊಂದಿಗೆ 					__postpos;
ಒಂದಿಗೆ:ರೊಂದಿಗೆ 					__postpos;
ಒಂದಿಗೆ:ದೊಂದಿಗೆ 					__postpos;
ನೊಡನೆ:ನೊಡನೆ 						__postpos;
ನೊಡನೆ:ರೊಡನೆ 						__postpos;
ಈಚೆಗೆ:ಈಚೆಗೆ 						__postpos;
ಈಚೆಗೆ:ಈಚಿನ 						__postpos;!?
ಒಳಪಟ್ಟ:ಒಳಪಟ್ಟ 					__postpos;	
ಸಮೇತ:ಸಮೇತ 						__postpos;
ಪರ:ಪರ 							__postpos;
ಕೂಡಾ:ಕೂಡಾ 						__postpos;
ನಿಂದ:ನಿಂದ 						__postpos;
ತರುವಾಯ:ತರುವಾಯ 					__postpos;	
ಕೂಡ:ಕೂಡ 						__postpos;
ತನಕ:ತನಕ 							__postpos;
ಪರ್ಯಂತರ:ಪರ್ಯಂತರ 				__postpos;
ವರಿಗೆ:ವರಿಗೆ 						__postpos;
ಬಗ್ಯೆ:ಬಗ್ಯೆ 						__postpos;
ನಿಮಿತ್ತ:ನಿಮಿತ್ತ 					__postpos;
ಎದುರು:ಎದುರು						__postpos;
ರಲ್ಲಿ:ರಲ್ಲಿ 						__postpos;
ಅದಕ್ಕಾಗಿ:ಅದಕ್ಕಾಗಿ  				__postpos;
ಇವರೆಲ್ಲಾ:ಇವರೆಲ್ಲಾ 				__postpos;!
ವಿರುದ್ದ:ವಿರುದ್ದ 					__postpos;
ಮೇರೆಗೆ:ಮೇರೆಗೆ 						__postpos;
ಹಾಗೆ:ಹಾಗೆ 							__postpos;
ಮಧ್ಯ:ಮಧ್ಯ  					__postpos;
ವೇಳೆಗೆ:ವೇಳೆಗೆ 						__postpos;
ಸಲುವಾಗಿ:ಸಲುವಾಗಿ 					__postpos;
ಹಿಂದೆ:ಹಿಂದೆ 						__postpos;
ಅಡಿಯಲ್ಲಿ:ಅಡಿಯಲ್ಲಿ 				__postpos;
ಪರವಾಗಿ:ಪರವಾಗಿ 					__postpos;
ಆಯಾ:ಆಯಾ 						__postpos;
ಬದಲು:ಬದಲು 						__postpos;
ಮುಖಾಂತರ:ಮುಖಾಂತರ 				__postpos;
ಕ್ಕೂ:ಕ್ಕೂ 						__postpos;
ವತಿಯಿಂದ:ವತಿಯಿಂದ 				__postpos;
ಹಿಂದಿನ:ಹಿಂದಿನ 					__postpos;
ಸಹಿತ:ಸಹಿತ 						__postpos;
ಗಳಷ್ಟು :ಗಳಷ್ಟು  					__postpos;!not sure
ನು:ನು 							__postpos;!case
ಸಬ್:ಸಬ್ 							__prepos;!Sub		
ವಿತ್:ವಿತ್ 						__prepos;
ಆಫ್:ಆಫ್ 						__prepos;!of
ಆಫ್:ಆಪ್ 						__prepos;!of			
ಆಫ್:ಆಫ್ 						__prepos;!of
ಆಫ್:ಒಫ್  						__prepos;!of
ಆಫ್:ಆಫ 							__prepos;	
ಅಫ್:ಅಫ್ 						__prepos;!of
ಅಪ್:ಅಪ್ 						__prepos;!of
ಇನ್:ಇನ್ 							__prepos;!in
ಫಾರ್:ಫಾರ್ 						__prepos;!for
ಟು:ಟು 							__prepos;!to
ಆನ್:ಆನ್ 							__prepos;!on
ಆನ್:ಅನ್ 							__prepos;!on
ಇಂಟರ್:ಇಂಟರ್ 						__prepos;!inter
ಅಟ್:ಅಟ್ 						__prepos;!at
ಎಕ್ಸ್.:ಎಕ್ಸ್ 						__prepos;!ex
ಆರ್:ಆರ್ 							__prepos;
ಪರ್:ಪರ್  						__prepos;!per		
ಫ್ರಮ್:ಫ್ರಮ್  					__prepos;!per
ವಿಥ್:ವಿಥ್ 						__prepos;!
ಆಫ್ಟರ್:ಆಫ್ಟರ್ 					__prepos;!After
ಟ್ರ್ಯಾನ್ಸ್:ಟ್ರ್ಯಾನ್ಸ್  			__prepos;!Trans
ಮಾಜಿ:ಮಾಜಿ 						__prepos;
ಅವರೊಂದಿಗೆ:ಅವರೊಂದಿಗೆ 				__prepos;
ಹಾಗೊಂದು:ಹಾಗೊಂದು 					__prepos;    !n
ಉಪ:ಉಪ 							__prepos;
ಮರು:ಮರು 						__prepos;
ಕೆ:ಕೆ 								__prepos;
ಒಳ:ಒಳ 							__prepos;
ಪುನರ್:ಪುನರ್ 						__prepos;
